District of Columbia statutes.
24-261.05

Exemptions from leasing and property laws.

(a)

Notwithstanding § 1-301.91, and § 10-801, the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to sell and leaseback, in his discretion, for the best interests of the District of Columbia, the Correctional Treatment Facility, situated on Lot 800 of Square 1112, with a street address of 1901 E Street, S.E.

(b)

Notwithstanding § 10-111, the Council of the District of Columbia approves the transfer from the United States government to the District of Columbia of jurisdiction over that portion of Lot 800 of Square 1112 upon which is situated the District of Columbia Correctional Treatment Facility, as shown on a plat to be drawn and filed in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia.

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-276, § 6, 44 DCR 1416
1981 Ed., § 24-495.5.